src/fst/stems/numbers.lexd
LEXICON Cardinal_Numbers
maajun
jun
wiib'
oxib'
kaahib'
oob'
waqib'
wuqub'
waqxaqib'
b'eleeb'
lajeeb'
junlaju
kab'laju
oxlaju
kaalaju
o'laju
waqlaju
wuqlaju
waqxaqlaju
b'eleelaju

LEXICON Arabic_Numerals
/(([,.])?([0-9])+)+/

LEXICON Distributive_Numbers
junqjunq
ka'kab'
ox'ox'
kaaka
o'otq
waqitq
wuqutq
wajxaqitq
b'eleetq
lajeetq
junqtaqlaju
kab'taqlaju
oxtaqlaju
kataqlaju
o'taqlaju
waqtaqlaju
wuqtaqlaju
wajxaqtaqlaju
b'eletaqlaju
junmaytq

LEXICON Ordinal_Numbers
xb'een
xkab'
rox
xka
ro'
xwaq
xwuq
xwaqxaq
xb'elee
xlajee
xjunlajuil
xkab'lajuil
roxlajuil
xkaalajuil
ro'lajuil
xwaqlajuil
xwuqlajuil
xwajxaqlajuil
xb'ele'lajuil
xjunmayil

PATTERN Numbers
Cardinal_Numbers [<Card>:]
Ordinal_Numbers [<Ord>:]
Distributive_Numbers [<Distr>:]
Arabic_Numerals [<Num>:]
